Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-172
Standard codes;
adoption; copy on file; area where applicable.

The
county board may adopt by resolution, which shall have the force and effect
of law, the conditions, provisions, limitations, and terms of a building code,
a plumbing code, an electrical code, a fire prevention code, or any other
code relating to building or relating to the erection, construction, reconstruction,
alteration, repair, conversion, maintenance, placing, or using of any building,
structure, automobile trailer, house trailer, or cabin trailer. For this purpose,
the county board may adopt any standard code which contains rules or regulations
printed as a code in book or pamphlet form by reference to such code or portions
thereof without setting forth in the resolution the conditions, provisions,
limitations, or terms of such code. When such code or any such standard code
or portion thereof is incorporated by reference into any resolution, it shall
have the same force and effect as though it has been spread at large in such
resolution without further or additional publication. One copy of such code
or such standard code or portion thereof shall be filed for use and examination
by the public in the office of the clerk of such county prior to its adoption.
The adoption of any standard code by reference shall be construed to incorporate
such amendments thereof as may be made if the copy of such standard code is
kept current in the office of the clerk of the county. If there is no county
resolution adopting a plumbing code in effect for such county, the 2009 Uniform Plumbing Code accredited
by the American National Standards Institute shall
apply to all buildings. Any code adopted and approved by the county board,
as provided in this section, or if there is no county resolution adopting
a plumbing code in effect for such county, the 2009 Uniform Plumbing Code accredited by the American
National Standards Institute, and
the building permit requirements or occupancy permit requirements imposed
by such code or by sections 23-114.04 and 23-114.05, shall apply to all of
the county except within the limits of any incorporated city or village and
except within an unincorporated area where a city or village has been granted
zoning jurisdiction and is exercising such jurisdiction. Nothing in this section
shall be interpreted as creating an obligation for the county to inspect plumbing
work done within its jurisdiction to determine compliance with the plumbing
code.

Laws 1941, c. 131, § 19, p. 515;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-159;

R.S.1943, § 23-172;

Laws 1961, c. 87, § 6, p. 302;

Laws 1963, c. 57, § 5, p. 241;

Laws 1967, c. 117, § 12, p. 375;

Laws 1975, LB 410, § 28;

Laws 1993, LB 35, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1304, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB42, § 3.
July 19, 2012